District of Columbia statutes.
44-1209

Impact on insurance coverage.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any insurer from providing the coverage required by Chapter 31 of Title 31.

Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-80, § 10, 36 DCR 8469
1981 Ed., § 32-1609.